New York, session 2025-2026, S301.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 507 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Photograph religious exemption. A person shall not be required to 4 have their photograph taken for a driver's license or learner's permit 5 when such person holds genuine and sincere religious beliefs which are 6 contrary to having a photograph taken; provided, however, that licenses 7 issued without a photograph pursuant to this subdivision shall not be 8 used for proof of age required for entry to an establishment or purchase 9 of age-restricted products. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01116-01-5